Hawaii statutes.
[§46-174] Statute of limitations. An
action for false claims to a county pursuant to this part shall be brought
within six years after the false claim is discovered or by exercise of
reasonable diligence should have been discovered and, in any event, no more
than ten years after the date on which the violation of section 46-171 is
committed. [L 2001, c 227, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next